Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2615.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-15-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-15 entitled "Passing, Use
of Lanes, and Rules of the Road" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-15-2. Slow traffic to right.
(a) Upon all roadways any vehicle proceeding at less than the normal speed of traffic at the
time and place and under the conditions then existing shall be driven in the right-hand lane then
available for traffic, or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except
when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing
for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway. Violations of this section are
subject to fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
(b) On any multi-lane, limited access highway, the extreme left-hand lane shall be reserved
for passing slower vehicles only, and occupation of that lane when not passing shall be a violation
of this section and subject to the fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004399
========